North Carolina statutes. Chapter 130A. Public Health.
Article 9. Solid Waste Management.
§ 130A-309.13.
Solid Waste Management Outreach Program.

The Department shall develop an outreach program to promote waste reduction and recycling. From funds available to the Department for this program, the Department may engage in any of the following outreach activities:

Provide public education regarding waste reduction and recycling.

Provide technical assistance regarding waste reduction and recycling to units of local government.

Conduct research on the solid waste stream in North Carolina.

Develop secondary materials markets by providing technical and financial support, including providing technical and financial support to private recycling businesses, including use of processed scrap tire materials.

Provide funding for the activities of the Division of Environmental Assistance and Outreach.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to allow the Department to satisfy grant obligations that extend beyond the end of the fiscal year.

The Department shall include in the report required by G.S. 130A-309.06(c) a description of the outreach program under this section. This report shall specify the type of outreach activity under each of subdivisions (1) through (5) under subsection (a)
of this section and the amount of program funds the Department expended for each activity during the previous year.

History.
2013-360, s. 14.18(c).

§ 130A-309.14.
Duties of State agencies.

Each State agency, including the General Assembly, the General Court of Justice, and The University of North Carolina shall:

Establish a program in cooperation with the Department and the Department of Administration for the collection of all recyclable materials generated in State offices throughout the State. The program shall provide that recycling containers are readily
accessible on each floor where State employees are located in a building occupied by a State agency. Recycling containers required pursuant to this subdivision shall be clearly labeled to identify the types of recyclable
materials to be deposited in each container and, to the extent practicable, recycling containers for glass, plastic, and aluminum shall be located near trash receptacles. The program shall provide for the collection of
all of the following recyclable materials.

Aluminum.

Newspaper.

Sorted office paper.

Recyclable glass.

Plastic bottles.

As used in this subdivision, the term “sorted office paper” means paper used in offices that is of a high quality for purposes of recycling and includes copier paper, computer paper, letterhead, ledger, white envelopes, and bond paper.

Provide procedures for collecting and storing recyclable materials, containers for storing materials, and contractual or other arrangements with buyers of the recyclable materials.

(4)
Establish and implement, in cooperation with the Department and the Department of Administration, a solid waste reduction program for materials used in the course of agency operations. The program shall
be designed and implemented to achieve maximum feasible reduction of solid waste generated as a result of agency operations.

(5)
Prepare any written report in compliance with the model report under subsection (j) of this section. The State agency shall, in lieu of distributing the report in mass:

Notify persons to whom each agency is required to report, and any other persons it deems appropriate, that a report has been published, its subject and title, and the locations, including State libraries, at which the report is available;

Deliver any report to only those State libraries that each agency determines is likely to receive requests for a particular report; and

Distribute a report to only those who request the report.A State library that has received a report shall distribute a report only upon request. Any State agency required by law to report to an entity shall be in compliance with that law by notifying
that entity under sub-subdivision a. of this subdivision.

The Department of Administration and the Department of Transportation shall each provide by 1 October of each year to the Department of Environmental Quality a detailed description of the respective Agency’s review and revision of bid procedures and purchase
and use of reusable, refillable, repairable, more durable, and less toxic supplies and products. The information provided by the Department of Administration and the Department of Transportation to the Department of Environmental
Quality shall also be included in the report required by G.S. 130A-309.06(c).

(a1)
The Department of Administration shall review and revise its bid procedures and specifications set forth in Article 3 of Chapter 143 of the General Statutes and the Department of Transportation shall
review and revise its bid procedures and specifications set forth in Article 2 of Chapter 136 of the General Statutes to encourage the purchase or use of reusable, refillable, repairable, more durable, and less toxic
supplies and products.

(1)
The Department of Administration shall require the procurement of such supplies and products to the extent that the purchase or use is practicable and cost-effective. The Department of Administration
shall require the purchase or use of remanufactured toner cartridges for laser printers to the extent practicable.

(2)
The Department of Transportation shall require the purchase or use of such supplies and products in the construction and maintenance of highways and bridges to the extent that the purchase or use is practicable
and cost-effective.

(3)
The Department of Administration and the Department of Transportation shall each provide by 1 October of each year to the Department of Environmental Quality a detailed description of the respective Agency’s
review and revision of bid procedures and purchase and use of reusable, refillable, repairable, more durable, and less toxic supplies and products. The information provided by the Department of Administration and the
Department of Transportation to the Department of Environmental Quality shall also be included in the report required by G.S. 130A-309.06(c).

The Department of Commerce shall assist and encourage the recycling industry in the State. Assistance and encouragement of the recycling industry shall include:

Assisting the Department in the identification and analysis, by the Department pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.06

, of components of the State’s recycling industry and present and potential markets for recyclable materials in this State, other states, and foreign countries;

Providing information on the availability and benefits of using recycled materials to businesses and industries in the State; and

Distributing any material prepared in implementing this section to the public, businesses, industries, units of local government, or other organizations upon request.

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 250, s. 2.

The Department of Commerce shall investigate the potential markets for composted materials and shall submit its findings to the Department for the waste registry informational program administered by the Department in order to stimulate absorption of
available composted materials into such markets.

On or before 1 March 1991, the Department of Commerce shall report to the General Assembly its findings relative to:

Potential markets for composted materials, including private and public sector markets;

The types of materials which may legally and effectively be used in a successful composting operation; and

The manner in which the composted materials should be marketed for optimum use.

All State agencies, including the Department of Transportation and the Department of Administration, and units of local government are required to procure compost products when they can be substituted for, and cost no more than, regular soil amendment
products, provided the compost products meet all applicable engineering and environmental quality standards, specifications, and rules. This product preference shall apply to, but not be limited to, highway construction
and maintenance projects, highway planting and beautification projects, recultivation and erosion control programs, and other projects.

The Department of Transportation shall, consistent with economic feasibility and applicable engineering and environmental quality standards, use scrap tires, demolition debris, and untreated, stabilized, or encapsulated ash from boilers and incinerators
in highway construction and maintenance projects.

The Department of Public Instruction, with the assistance of the Department and The University of North Carolina, shall develop, distribute, and encourage the use of guidelines for the collection of recyclable materials and for solid waste reduction in
the State system of education. At a minimum, the guidelines shall address solid waste generated in administrative offices, classrooms, dormitories, and cafeterias. The guidelines shall be developed by 1 January 1991.

In order to orient students and their families to the recycling of waste and to encourage the participation of schools, communities, and families in recycling programs, the school board of each school district in the State shall make available an awareness
program in the recycling of waste materials. The program shall be provided at both the elementary and secondary levels of education.

The Department of Public Instruction is directed to develop, from funds appropriated for environmental education, curriculum materials and resource guides for a recycling awareness program for instruction at the elementary, middle, and high school levels.

The Department of Administration shall develop a model report for reports published by any State agency, the General Assembly, the General Court of Justice, or The University of North Carolina. This model report shall satisfy the following:

The paper in the report shall, to the extent economically practicable, be made from recycled paper and shall be capable of being recycled.

The other constituent elements of the report shall, to the extent economically practicable, be made from recycled products and shall be capable of being recycled or reused.

The report shall be printed on both sides of the paper if no additional time, staff, equipment, or expense would be required to fulfill this requirement.

State publications that are of historical and enduring value and importance to the citizens of North Carolina shall be printed on alkaline (acid-free) paper according to

G.S. 125-11.13

.

The Department of Transportation shall provide and maintain recycling containers at each rest area located in this State on a highway in the Interstate Highway System or in the State highway system for the collection of each of the following recyclable
materials for which recycling is feasible:

Aluminum.

Newspaper.

Recyclable glass.

Plastic bottles.

For each rest area that has recycling containers, the Department of Transportation shall install signs, or modify existing signs, that are proximately located to the rest area to notify motorists that the rest area has recycling containers.

Any State agency or agency of a political subdivision of the State that is using State funds, or any person contracting with any agency with respect to work performed under contract, shall procure products of recycled steel if all of the following conditions
are satisfied:

The product must be acquired competitively within a reasonable time frame.

The product must meet appropriate performance standards.

The product must be acquired at a reasonable price.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission, with the assistance of the Department, shall develop a model recycling program for holders of on-premises malt beverage permits, on-premises unfortified wine permits, on-premises fortified wine permits, and mixed
beverages permits under

G.S. 18B-1001

that are required to recycle beverage containers under

G.S. 18B-1006.1

. The model program shall provide for the separation, storage, and collection for recycling of all beverage containers that are required to be recycled under

G.S. 18B-1006.1

and shall provide alternatives that reflect variations in local circumstances across the State. The Alcoholic Beverage Control Commission may adopt rules to comply with this section.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 522, s. 1; 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 959, s. 32; 1993, c. 197, s. 1; c. 250, ss. 1, 2; c. 448, ss. 1, 2; c. 553, s. 74; 2001-144, s. 1; 2001-452, s. 3.3; 2001-512, ss. 13, 14; 2003-284, s.
6.10(a); 2003-340, s. 1.6; 2005-348, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.30(u).

§ 130A-309.14A.
Reports by certain State-assisted entities.

Any community college, as defined in

G.S. 115D-2(2)

, and any nonprofit corporation that receives State funds are encouraged to prepare any written reports in compliance with G.S. 130A-309.14(j).

History.
1993, c. 448, s. 3.

§ 130A-309.15.
Prohibited acts regarding used oil.

No person may knowingly:

Collect, transport, store, recycle, use, or dispose of used oil in any manner which endangers the public health or welfare.

Discharge used oil into sewers, drainage systems, septic tanks, surface waters, groundwaters, watercourses, or marine waters.

Dispose of used oil in landfills in the State unless such disposal has been approved by the Department.

Mix used oil with solid waste that is to be disposed of in landfills.

Mix used oil with hazardous substances that make it unsuitable for recycling or beneficial use.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished as provided by G.S. 130A-25(a) and

G.S. 14-3

.

A person who disposes of used oil in a landfill where such used oil has been mixed with other solid waste which may be lawfully disposed of in such landfill, and who is without knowledge that such solid waste has been mixed with used oil, is not guilty
of a violation under this section.

Used oil shall not be used for road oiling, dust control, weed abatement, or other similar purposes that have the potential to release used oil into the environment.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.16.
Public education program regarding used oil collection and recycling.

The Department shall conduct a public education program to inform the public of the needs for and benefits of collecting and recycling used oil and shall:

Encourage persons who annually sell at retail, in containers for use off the premises, more than 500 gallons of oil to provide the purchasers with information on the locations of collection facilities and information on proper disposal practices.

Establish, maintain, and publicize a used oil information center that disperses materials or information explaining local, State, and federal laws and rules governing used oil and informing the public of places and methods for proper disposal of used
oil.

Encourage the voluntary establishment of used oil collection and recycling programs and provide technical assistance to persons who organize such programs.

Encourage the procurement of recycled automotive, industrial, and fuel oils and oils blended with recycled oils for all State and local government uses. Recycled oils procured under this section shall meet equipment manufacturer’s specifications.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2017-209, s. 2(b), effective October 4, 2017.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 2015-241, s. 14.16(c); 2015-286, s. 4.11(b); repealed by Session Laws 2017-209, s. 2(b), effective October 4, 2017.

§ 130A-309.18.
Regulation of used oil as hazardous waste.

Nothing in this Part shall prohibit the Department from regulating used oil as a hazardous waste in a manner consistent with applicable federal law and this Article.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.19.
Coordination with other State agencies.

The Department of Transportation shall study the feasibility of using recycled oil products in road construction activities and shall report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives annually, beginning
1 January 1991, on the results of its study.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.20.
Public used oil collection centers.

The Department shall encourage the voluntary establishment of public used oil collection centers and recycling programs and provide technical assistance to persons who organize such programs.

All State agencies and businesses that change motor oil for the public are encouraged to serve as public used oil collection centers.

A public used oil collection center must:

Notify the Department annually that it is accepting used oil from the public; and

Annually report quantities of used oil collected from the public.

No person may recover from the owner or operator of a used oil collection center any costs of response actions resulting from a release of either used oil or a hazardous substance against the owner or operator of a used oil collection center if such used
oil is:

Not mixed with any hazardous substance by the owner or operator of the used oil collection center;

Not knowingly accepted with any hazardous substances contained therein;

Transported from the used oil collection center by a certified transporter pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.23

; and

Stored in a used oil collection center that is in compliance with this section.

Subsection (d) of this section applies only to that portion of the public used oil collection center used for the collection of used oil and does not apply if the owner or operator is grossly negligent in the operation of the public used oil collection
center. Nothing in this section shall affect or modify in any way the obligations or liability of any person under any other provisions of State or federal law, including common law, for injury or damage resulting from a release
of used oil or hazardous substances. For purposes of this section, the owner or operator of a used oil collection center may presume that a quantity of no more than five gallons of used oil accepted from any member of the public
is not mixed with a hazardous substance, provided that the owner or operator acts in good faith.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.21.
Incentives program.

The Department is authorized to establish an incentives program for individuals who change their own oil to encourage them to return their used oil to a used oil collection center.

The incentives used by the Department may involve the use of discount or prize coupons, prize drawings, promotional giveaways, or other activities the Department determines will promote collection, reuse, or proper disposal of used oil.

The Department may contract with a promotion company to administer the incentives program.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.22.
Grants to local governments.

The Department shall develop a grants program for units of local government to encourage the collection, reuse, and proper disposal of used oil. No grant may be made for any project unless the project is approved by the Department.

The Department shall consider for grant assistance any unit of local government project that uses one or more of the following programs or any activity that the Department feels will reduce the improper disposal and reuse of used oil:

Curbside pickup of used oil containers by a unit of local government or its designee.

Retrofitting of solid waste equipment to promote curbside pickup or disposal of used oil at used oil collection centers designated by the unit of local government.

Establishment of publicly operated used oil collection centers at landfills or other public places.

Providing containers and other materials and supplies that the public can utilize in an environmentally sound manner to store used oil for pickup or return to a used oil collection center.

Providing incentives for the establishment of privately operated public used oil collection centers.

Eligible projects shall be funded according to provisions established by the Department; however, no grant may exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

The Department shall initiate rule making on or before 1 January 1991, necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.23.
Certification of used oil transporters.

Any person who transports over public highways after 1 January 1992, more than 500 gallons of used oil in any week must be a certified transporter or must be employed by a person who is a certified transporter.

The Department of Transportation shall develop a certification program for transporters of used oil, and shall issue, deny, or revoke certifications authorizing the holder to transport used oil. Certification requirements shall help assure that a used
oil transporter is familiar with appropriate rules and used oil management procedures.

The Department of Transportation shall adopt rules governing certification, which shall include requirements for the following:

Registration and annual reporting pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.17

.

Evidence of familiarity with applicable State laws and rules governing used oil transportation.

Proof of liability insurance or other means of financial responsibility for any liability which may be incurred in the transport of used oil.

Marking, by the certified transporter of used oil, of all vehicles which transport used oil or all containers of used oil when it is not feasible to mark the vehicle. The mark must clearly identify the certified used oil transporter and clearly indicate
that the vehicle is used to transport used oil. The marking must be visible to others travelling on the highway.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1991, c. 488, s. 1.

§ 130A-309.24.
Permits for used oil recycling facilities.

Each person who intends to operate, modify, or close a used oil recycling facility shall obtain an operation or closure permit from the Department prior to operating, modifying, or closing the facility.

By 1 January 1992, the Department shall develop a permitting system for used or recycling facilities after reviewing and considering the applicability of the permit system for hazardous waste treatment, storage, or disposal facilities.

Permits shall not be required under this section for the burning of used oil as a fuel, provided:

A valid air permit issued by the Department is in effect for the facility; and

The facility burns used oil in accordance with applicable United States Environmental Protection Agency regulations, local government regulations, and the requirements and conditions of its air permit.

No permit is required under this section for the use of used oil for the beneficiation or flotation of phosphate rock.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.25.
Training of operators of solid waste management facilities.

The Department shall establish qualifications for, and encourage the development of training programs for, operators of incinerators, operators of landfills, coordinators of local recycling programs, and other solid waste management facilities.

The Department shall work with accredited community colleges, vocational technical centers, State universities, and private institutions in developing educational materials, courses of study, and other such information to be made available for persons
seeking to be trained as operators of solid waste management facilities.

A person may not perform the duties of an operator of a solid waste management facility after 1 January 1998, unless he has completed an operator training course approved by the Department. An owner of a solid waste management facility may not employ
any person to perform the duties of an operator unless the person has completed an approved solid waste management facility operator training course.

The Commission may adopt rules and minimum standards to effectuate the provisions of this section and to ensure the safe, healthy, and lawful operation of solid waste management facilities. The Commission may establish, by rule, various classifications
for operators to address the need for differing levels of training required to operate various types of solid waste management facilities due to different operating requirements at the facilities.

In developing training programs for incinerator operators under this section, the Department shall establish and consult with ad hoc advisory groups to help coordinate the requirements under this section with other training programs for incinerator operators.

This section does not apply to any operator of a solid waste management facility who has five years continuous experience as an operator of a solid waste management facility immediately preceding January 1, 1998, provided that the operator attends a course
and completes the continuing education requirements approved by the Department.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1993, c. 29, s. 1; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 19; 1997-443, s. 15.49(a).

§ 130A-309.26.
Regulation of medical waste.

As used in this section:

“Sharps” means needles, syringes, and scalpel blades.

“Treatment” means any process, including steam sterilization, chemical treatment, incineration, and other methods approved by the Commission which changes the character or composition of medical waste so as to render it noninfectious.

It is the intent of the General Assembly to protect the public health by establishing standards for the safe packaging, storage, treatment, and disposal of medical waste. The Commission shall adopt and the Department shall enforce rules for the packaging,
storage, treatment, and disposal of:

Medical waste at facilities where medical waste is generated;

Medical waste from the point at which the waste is transported from the facility where it was generated;

On-site and off-site treatment of medical waste; and

The off-site transport, storage, treatment or disposal of medical waste.

No later than 1 August 1990, the Commission shall adopt rules necessary to protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public and to carry out the purpose of this section. Such rules shall address, but need not be limited to, the packaging of medical
waste, including specific requirements for the safe packaging of sharps and the segregation, storage, treatment, and disposal of medical wastes at the facilities in which such waste is generated.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 20.

§ 130A-309.27.
Joint and several liability.

As used in this section:

“Owner or operator” means, in addition to the usual meanings of the term, any owner of record of any interest in land on which a landfill is or has been sited, any person or business entity that owns a majority interest in any other business entity which
is the owner or operator of a landfill, and any person designated as a joint permittee pursuant to G.S. 130A-295.2(e).

“Proceeds” means all funds collected and received by the Department, including interest and penalties on delinquent fees.

Every owner or operator of a landfill is jointly and severally liable for the improper operation and closure of the landfill, as provided by law.

through (f) Repealed by Session Laws 2007-550, s. 5(b), effective August 1, 2007.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2; 2007-550, s. 5(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-550, s. 5(b), effective August 1, 2007, and applicable to any application for a permit for a solid waste management facility that is pending on that date, in the section heading, substituted “Joint and several liability” for “Landfill
escrow account” in the section heading; in subdivision (a)(1), made a stylistic change, substituted “business entity” for “corporation” both times it appears, and added “and any person designated as a joint permittee pursuant to G.S.
130A-295.2(e)”; and deleted subsections (c) through (f).

§ 130A-309.28.
University research.

Research, training, and service activities related to solid and hazardous waste management conducted by The University of North Carolina shall be coordinated by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina through the Office of the President.
Proposals for research contracts and grants; public service assignments; and responses to requests for information and technical assistance by the State and units of local government, business, and industry shall be addressed by a
formal process involving an advisory board of university personnel appointed by the President and chaired and directed by an individual appointed by the President. The Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina shall consult
with the Department in developing the research programs and provide the Department with a copy of the proposed research program for review and comment before the research is undertaken. Research contracts shall be awarded to independent
nonprofit colleges and universities within the State which are accredited by the Southern Association of Colleges and Schools on the same basis as those research contracts awarded to The University of North Carolina. Research activities
shall include the following areas:

Methods and processes for recycling solid and hazardous waste;

Methods of treatment for detoxifying hazardous waste; and

Technologies for disposing of solid and hazardous waste.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 2.

§ 130A-309.29.
Adoption of rules.

The Commission may adopt rules to implement the provisions of this Part pursuant to Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.
1991, c. 621, s. 12; 2000-189, s. 12.

§§ 130A-309.30 through 130A-309.50.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

Part 2B. Scrap Tire Disposal Act.

§ 130A-309.51.
Title.

This Part may be cited as the “North Carolina Scrap Tire Disposal Act.”

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3.

§ 130A-309.52.
Findings; purpose.

The General Assembly finds that:

Scrap tire disposal poses a unique and troublesome solid waste management problem.

Scrap tires are a usable resource that may be recycled for energy value.

Uncontrolled disposal of scrap tires may create a public health and safety problem because tire piles act as breeding sites for mosquitoes and other disease-transmitting vectors, pose substantial fire hazards, and present a difficult disposal problem
for landfills.

A significant number of scrap tires are illegally dumped in North Carolina.

It is in the State’s best interest to encourage efforts to recycle or recover resources from scrap tires.

It is desirable to allow units of local government to control tire disposal for themselves and to encourage multicounty, regional approaches to scrap tire disposal and collection.

It is desirable to encourage reduction in the volume of scrap tires being disposed of at public sanitary landfills.

The purpose of this Part is to provide statewide guidelines and structure for the environmentally safe disposal of scrap tires to be administered through units of local government.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3.

§ 130A-309.53.
Definitions.

Unless a different meaning is required by the context, the following definitions shall apply throughout this Part:

“Collection site” means a site used for the storage of scrap tires.

“Disposal fee” is any amount charged by a tire collector, tire processor, or unit of local government in exchange for accepting scrap tires.

“In-county scrap tire” means any scrap tire brought for disposal from inside the county in which the collection or processing site is located.

“Out-of-county scrap tire” means any scrap tire brought for disposal from outside the county in which the collection or processing site is located.

“Processing site” means a site actively used to produce or manufacture usable materials, including fuel, from scrap tires. Commercial enterprises processing scrap tires shall not be considered solid waste management facilities insofar as the provisions
of G.S. 130A-294(a)(4) and G.S. 130A-294(b) are concerned.

“Scrap tire” means a tire that is no longer suitable for its original, intended purpose because of wear, damage, or defect.

“Tire” means a continuous solid or pneumatic rubber covering that encircles the wheel of a vehicle. Bicycle tires and other tires for vehicles propelled by human power are not subject to the provisions of this Part.

“Tire collector” means a person who owns or operates a site used for the storage, collection, or deposit of more than 50 scrap tires.

“Tire hauler” means a person engaged in the picking up or transporting of scrap tires for the purpose of storage, processing, or disposal.

“Tire processor” means a person who engages in the processing of scrap tires or one who owns or operates a tire processing site.

“Tire retailer” means a person who engages in the retail sale of a tire in any quantity for any use or purpose by the purchaser other than for resale.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 1991, c. 221, s. 2; 1995 (Reg. Sess., 1996), c. 594, s. 21.

§ 130A-309.54.
Use of scrap tire tax proceeds.

Article 5B of Chapter 105 imposes a tax on new tires to provide funds for the disposal of scrap tires, for the cleanup of inactive hazardous waste sites under Part 3 of this Article, and for all the purposes for which the Bernard Allen Memorial Emergency
Drinking Water Fund may be used under

G.S. 87-98

. A county may use proceeds of the tax distributed to it under that Article only for the disposal of scrap tires pursuant to the provisions of this Part or for the abatement of a nuisance pursuant to

G.S. 130A-309.60

.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 1991, c. 221, s. 3; 1993, c. 364, s. 1(a); 2009-451, s. 13.3B(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-451, s. 13.3B(b), effective July 1, 2009, added “for the cleanup of inactive hazardous waste sites under Part 3 of this Article, and for all the purposes for which the Bernard Allen Memorial Emergency Drinking Water Fund may be used
under

G.S. 87-98

” at the end of the first sentence.

§§ 130A-309.55,
130A-309.56.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 221, s. 4.

Cross References.

As to privilege taxes imposed upon new tire sales, see

G.S. 105-187.16

.

As to use of such tax proceeds, see

G.S. 105-187.19

.

§ 130A-309.57.
Scrap tire disposal program.

The owner or operator of any scrap tire collection site shall, within six months after October 1, 1989, provide the Department with information concerning the site’s location, size, and the approximate number of scrap tires that are accumulated at the
site and shall initiate steps to comply with subsection (b) of this section.

On or after July 1, 1990:

A person may not maintain a scrap tire collection site or a scrap tire disposal site unless the site is permitted.

It is unlawful for any person to dispose of scrap tires in the State unless the scrap tires are disposed of at a scrap tire collection site or at a tire disposal site, or disposed of for processing at a scrap tire processing facility.

The Commission shall adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. Such rules shall:

Provide for the administration of scrap tire collector and collection center permits and scrap tire disposal site permits, which may not exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) annually.

Set standards for scrap tire processing facilities and associated scrap tire sites, scrap tire collection centers, and scrap tire collectors.

Authorize the final disposal of scrap tires at a permitted solid waste disposal facility provided the tires have been cut into sufficiently small parts to assure their proper disposal.

Repealed by Session Laws 2013-413, s. 18. For effective date, see Editor’s note.

A permit is not required for:

A tire retreading business where fewer than 1,000 scrap tires are kept on the business premises;

A business that, in the ordinary course of business, removes tires from motor vehicles if fewer than 1,000 of these tires are kept on the business premises; or

A retail tire-selling business which is serving as a scrap tire collection center if fewer than 1,000 scrap tires are kept on the business premises.

The Department shall encourage the voluntary establishment of scrap tire collection centers at retail tire-selling businesses, scrap tire processing facilities, and solid waste disposal facilities, to be open to the public for the deposit of used and
scrap tires. The Department may establish an incentives program for individuals to encourage them to return their used or scrap tires to a scrap tire collection center.

Permitted scrap tire collectors may not contract with a scrap tire processing facility, unless the processing facility documents that it has access to a facility permitted to receive the scrap tires.

History.
1989, c. 784, s. 3; 2012-200, s. 14(a); 2013-413, s. 18; 2014-115, s. 17.